Utah statutes.
57-3-105.   Legal description of real property and names and addresses required in documents.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided by statute, a person may not present a document for recording unless the document complies with this section.

(2)  A document executed after July 1, 1983, is entitled to be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property described in the document is located only if the document contains a legal description of the real property.

(3) (a)  A document conveying title to real property presented for recording after July 1, 1981, is entitled to be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property described in the document is located only if the document names the grantees and recites a mailing address to be used for assessment and taxation in addition to the legal description required under Subsection (2).

(b)  The address of the management committee may be used as the mailing address of a grantee as required in Subsection (3)(a) if the interest conveyed is a timeshare interest as defined by Section 57-19-2.

(4)  A person may not present and a county recorder may refuse to accept a document for recording if the document does not conform to this section.

(5)  Notwithstanding Subsections (2), (3), and (4), a master form, as defined in Section 57-3-201, that does not meet the requirements of Subsections (2) and (3) is entitled to be recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property described in the master form is located if it complies with Part 2, Master Mortgage and Trust Deeds.

